North Carolina, session 2025, HB128.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, the sum of two million dollars
($2,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of two million dollars
($2,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to establish and
administer a statewide Prostate Cancer Control Program that provides free or low-cost prostate
cancer screenings and follow-up to any man residing in North Carolina who meets all of the
following criteria:
(1) Is uninsured or underinsured.
(2) Is not a beneficiary of Medicare Part B or Medicaid.
(3) Is between 50 and 70 years of age and without a family history of prostate
cancer or is between 40 and 70 years of age with a family history of prostate
cancer. For the purpose of this subdivision, a man with a family history of
prostate cancer means any man with at least one first-degree relative who (i)
was diagnosed with prostate cancer, (ii) developed prostate cancer, (iii) died
as a result of prostate cancer, (iv) was diagnosed with a cancer known to be
associated with increased risk of prostate cancer, or (v) has a genetic alteration
known to be associated with increased risk of prostate cancer.
(4) Has a household income below two hundred fifty percent (250%) of the
federal poverty level.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H128-v-1*